test/src/morphology/A-uuzh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - ūž: # adjectives 219 'eng /est uus/fin' - full paradigm
     ūž+A+Sg+Nom: ūž
     ūž+A+Sg+Gen: ūd
     ūž+A+Sg+Par: ūdtõ
     ūž+A+Sg+Dat: ūdõn
     ūž+A+Sg+Ins: ūdkõks
     ūž+A+Sg+Ill: ūdõ
     ūž+A+Sg+Ela: ūdstõ
     ūž+A+Pl+Nom: ūd
     ūž+A+Pl+Gen: ūd
     ūž+A+Pl+Par: ūži
     ūž+A+Pl+Dat: ūdõn
     ūž+A+Pl+Ins: ūdkõks
     ūž+A+Pl+Ill: ūžiz
     ūž+A+Pl+Ela: ūžist
